Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 1 COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION
23-1-113.2. Department directive - admission standards for students holding international baccalaureate diplomas - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is in the best interests of the state to encourage the development and adoption of innovative and effective curricula for high school students;

The international baccalaureate diploma program is an established and well-respected program designed to provide innovative curricula world-wide;

In most other Western educational systems, secondary education includes the equivalent of a thirteenth grade, and the international baccalaureate diploma program conforms to this approach with its rigorous course of study over two years;

A student who has successfully completed the international baccalaureate diploma program is viewed as a highly attractive student by institutions of higher education due to the student's ambition, work habits, and scholarship;

Nationwide, institutions of higher education recognize the high level of academic sophistication of international baccalaureate students and many offer considerable college credit as an inducement for those students to attend their institutions;

Many Colorado international baccalaureate students leave the state to attend institutions of higher education that provide attractive offers of credit; and

It is in the best interests of Colorado to retain the state's best and brightest students who can establish permanent residency and subsequently contribute to the intellectual and economic vitality of the state.

It is therefore the intent of the general assembly in enacting this section that Colorado institutions of higher education be required to adopt comprehensive and reasonable policies to offer credit to international baccalaureate students.

The department shall ensure that each governing board of a state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institution of higher education in the state adopt and implement, for each of the institutions under its control, a policy for the acceptance of first-time freshman students who have successfully completed an international baccalaureate diploma program.

Each governing board shall report the policy adopted and implemented pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the department and shall make the policy available to the public in an electronic format.

Each governing board shall set the number of credits the institution may grant to a student who has successfully completed an international baccalaureate diploma program. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (2), the number of credits granted by an institution shall be, at a minimum, twenty-four semester credits or their equivalent. Each governing board shall identify the specific general education or elective requirements that the student satisfies by having successfully completed the international baccalaureate diploma program and shall outline the conditions necessary to award the credits.

Each institution may determine the level of student performance necessary to grant the credits, as measured by a student's exam performance in the specific courses constituting the international baccalaureate diploma program. An institution may only grant less than twenty-four semester credits or their equivalent if the student has received a score of less than four on an exam administered as part of the international baccalaureate diploma program, in which case the number of semester credits or their equivalent granted by the institution shall be reduced accordingly.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the Colorado school of mines while the institution is operating under a performance contract negotiated pursuant to section 23-41-104.6.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1213, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1474, § 12, effective May 28.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 818, § 7, effective May 18.

23-1-113.3. Commission directive - developmental education courses - report.

As part of the policy adopted by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-113 (1.5)(a), the commission shall adopt and the governing boards shall implement standards and procedures whereby state institutions of higher education may offer developmental education courses, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b), pursuant to this section, as prerequisites to a gateway course in English and mathematics, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b.5). Beginning in the 2022-23 academic year, no more than ten percent of students enrolling in a state institution of higher education shall be enrolled directly into a developmental education course, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b), that is prerequisite to a gateway course in English or mathematics if the developmental education course lengthens the student's time to degree beyond the time it would take the student to complete the degree if the student had enrolled directly into a gateway course.
(1) (a) (I) As part of the policy adopted by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-113 (1.5)(a), the commission shall adopt and the governing boards shall implement standards and procedures whereby state institutions of higher education may offer developmental education courses, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b), pursuant to this section, as prerequisites to a gateway course in English and mathematics, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b.5). Beginning in the 2022-23 academic year, no more than ten percent of students enrolling in a state institution of higher education shall be enrolled directly into a developmental education course, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b), that is prerequisite to a gateway course in English or mathematics if the developmental education course lengthens the student's time to degree beyond the time it would take the student to complete the degree if the student had enrolled directly into a gateway course.

On or before August 1, 2021, each state institution of higher education authorized pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section to offer developmental education courses, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b), shall have a plan in place to meet the requirements described in subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section. The commission's standards and procedures must allow an institution of higher education to request an extension from the commission of up to two years to meet the requirements described in subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section, upon demonstrating exceptional circumstances.

The commission's standards and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section must allow state institutions of higher education serving groups of students who are not successful in supplemental academic instruction to pilot different approaches that are more successful for those students and to request a waiver from the commission's standards and procedures in order to duplicate or expand successful approaches.

Subject to the provisions of this section, Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, Western Colorado university in Chaffee and Gunnison counties, any local community college, and any community college governed by the state board for community colleges and occupational education may offer developmental education courses, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b), and receive stipend payments from the state on behalf of eligible undergraduate students, as defined in section 23-18-102 (5).

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, any state institution of higher education not specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section is prohibited from offering a developmental education course, unless the course is offered by contract through any of the institutions of higher education specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2)(b) of this section, Metropolitan state university of Denver and the university of Colorado at Denver are prohibited from offering developmental education courses.

Each state institution of higher education shall track all students who are identified as needing additional supports to be successful in gateway courses in English or mathematics pursuant to section 23-1-113 (1.5) in order to determine whether those students successfully complete requirements for graduation.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, the department shall transmit annually to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, the joint budget committee, the commission, and the department of education an analysis of the data:

Regarding students who are identified as needing additional supports to be successful in gateway courses in English and mathematics, pursuant to section 23-1-113 (1.5), and who receive supplemental academic instruction or are enrolled in developmental education courses; and

Regarding the costs of providing supplemental academic instruction or developmental education courses pursuant to section 23-1-113 (1.5) and whether students who receive supplemental academic instruction or complete developmental education courses successfully complete the requirements for graduation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2019.)

Any state institution of higher education not specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section offering a developmental education course on a cash-funded basis shall report annually to the department the same data that is required to be compiled and tracked pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

(5.5) The institution and the department shall report the information specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this section on an individual student basis, using each student's unique student identifier.

For purposes of this section, "local community college" includes Aims community college and Colorado mountain college.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1482, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1021, § 37, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(2)(a) amended, p. 718, § 5, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2005:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1014, § 5, effective July 1, 2006.

L. 2008:

(1), (3)(c), (4), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1475, § 13, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(5.5) added, (HB 10-1171), ch. 401, p. 1935, § 6, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(2)(a), IP(3), and (5.5) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1365, § 15, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(2)(a), IP(3), and (5.5) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 757, § 10, effective May 19; (2)(c) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 425, § 8, effective July 1; (1), (2)(a), (3), (4)(a), and (5.5) amended, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1277, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(2)(a) and IP(3) amended, (SB 14-004), ch. 13, p. 123, § 6, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

IP(4)(a) amended, (HB 17-1251), ch. 253, p. 1058, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1206), ch. 133, p. 596, § 3, effective April 25; (2)(a) and IP(3) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3544, § 8, effective July 1.

23-1-113.5. Commission directive - resident admissions - report - definitions.

It is the intent of the general assembly that all state-supported institutions of higher education operate primarily to serve and educate the people of Colorado. The general assembly therefore directs the commission to develop admission policies to ensure that, beginning with the fall term of 1994 and for the fall term of each year thereafter, not less than fifty-five percent of the incoming freshman class at each state-supported institution of higher education are in-state students as defined in section 23-7-102 (5). Commencing with the fall term of 1995, this requirement shall be met if the percentage of in-state students in the incoming freshman class for the then current fall term and the two previous fall terms averages not less than fifty-five percent. Such fifty-five percent requirement shall also apply to the percentage of incoming freshmen students who are admitted based on criteria other than standardized test scores, high school class rank, and high school grade point average pursuant to section 23-1-113 (1)(b). In addition, the commission shall develop admission policies to ensure, beginning with the fiscal year which begins July 1, 1994, and for each fiscal year thereafter, that not less than two-thirds of the total student enrollment, including undergraduate and graduate students, at each campus of each state-supported institution of higher education, except the Colorado school of mines, are in-state students as defined in section 23-7-102 (5) and that not less than sixty percent of the total student enrollment, including undergraduate and graduate students, at the Colorado school of mines are in-state students as defined in section 23-7-102 (5). This requirement shall be met if, commencing with the fiscal year that begins July 1, 1995, the fraction of in-state students, as defined in section 23-7-102 (5), enrolled at each state-supported institution of higher education, except the Colorado school of mines, averages not less than two-thirds of the total fiscal year student enrollment for the then current fiscal year plus the two previous fiscal years. For the Colorado school of mines, this fraction of in-state students shall be not less than three-fifths. Such policies shall be implemented no later than July 1, 1994.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section regarding the fraction of students who are in-state students attending the Colorado school of mines shall also apply to Western Colorado university.

Repealed.

After one hundred percent of all qualified Colorado applicants have been accepted by Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, and Western Colorado university, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section regarding the fraction of students who are in-state students ceases to apply to said three state institutions of higher education.

After one hundred percent of all qualified Colorado applicants have been accepted by Adams state university, Fort Lewis college, Colorado Mesa university, and Western Colorado university, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section regarding the fraction of students who are in-state students ceases to apply to said four state institutions of higher education.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section regarding the fraction of students who are in-state students at institutions of higher education do not apply to any Native American student who attends Fort Lewis college. The calculation of the fraction of students at Fort Lewis college who are in-state students shall exclude any Native American student attending the college.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section regarding the percentage and fraction of students who are in-state students, as defined in section 23-7-102 (5), do not apply to the university of Colorado system, Colorado state university, the university of northern Colorado, or the Colorado school of mines if the following requirements are met:

The percentage of incoming freshmen admitted to the institution who are in-state students calculated on a three-year rolling average and excluding foreign students, is not less than fifty-five percent;

The percentage of students enrolled at each campus of the university of Colorado system, at Colorado state university, at the university of northern Colorado, or at the Colorado school of mines who are in-state students is not less than fifty-five percent of the total student enrollment at each campus of the university of Colorado system, at Colorado state university, at the university of northern Colorado, or at the Colorado school of mines, respectively, including undergraduate and graduate students, calculated on a three-year rolling average and excluding foreign students and students enrolled solely in online courses;

The institution continues to admit one hundred percent of all Colorado first-time freshman applicants who meet the guaranteed admissions criteria;

The percentage of in-state students admitted to each campus of the university of Colorado system, to the university of northern Colorado, or to Colorado state university based on criteria other than standardized test scores, high school class rank, and high school grade point average pursuant to section 23-1-113 (1)(b) does not fall below the average of the percentage admitted to the campus or to Colorado state university, respectively, for the three preceding academic years; and

The total number of foreign students enrolled at each specific campus of the university of Colorado system, at Colorado state university, at the university of northern Colorado, or at the Colorado school of mines does not exceed fifteen percent of the total student enrollment, including undergraduate and graduate students, enrolled at the campus, at Colorado state university, at the university of northern Colorado, or at the Colorado school of mines, respectively.

The university of Colorado and Colorado state university shall annually report to the commission information demonstrating that qualified in-state students are not displaced or denied admissions as a result of the provisions of this subsection (4) and that any increase in the enrollment of foreign students at a specific campus of the university of Colorado system or at Colorado state university is a result of increased capacity at the campus or at Colorado state university, respectively.

For purposes of this subsection (4), "foreign student" means a student who is counted as foreign and present in the United States on a nonimmigrant visa.

Beginning October 15, 2018, and no later than October 15 each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee and to the education committees of the house of representatives and of the senate, or their successor committees, demonstrating that the institutions included in this subsection (4) have met resident admission and enrollment requirements set forth in this section for the prior fiscal year.
(d) (I) (A) Beginning October 15, 2018, and no later than October 15 each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee and to the education committees of the house of representatives and of the senate, or their successor committees, demonstrating that the institutions included in this subsection (4) have met resident admission and enrollment requirements set forth in this section for the prior fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirements in subsection (4)(d)(I)(A) of this section continue indefinitely.

The department and the institutions shall ensure that the data required for these calculations is consistently included in the state's student records database, including data on the number of students with in-state classification and out-of-state classification, the number classified as international students for purposes of the calculation, the resident and nonresident students classified as online only students for purposes of the calculation, and the number of students classified as Colorado scholars pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. The report shall include both the nominal numbers of students in each relevant category and the calculation demonstrating the institution's compliance with this section.

As part of the report required pursuant to this subsection (4)(d), in collaboration with the institutions, the department shall demonstrate that the institutions are complying with the provisions of section 23-1-113 (1)(a) that require that the academic admission standards for students who do not have in-state status, as determined pursuant to section 23-7-103, are equal to or exceed those established for determining admission of in-state students, and the requirements of subsection (4)(b) of this section, that require that certain institutions annually report information demonstrating that qualified in-state students are not displaced or denied admission as a result of the provisions of this subsection (4).

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, beginning in the fall semester of 2013, a state-supported institution of higher education or a campus of the institution may count each Colorado scholar who enrolls at the institution or the campus of the institution as two in-state students for purposes of calculating the percentages and fractions of in-state students required in this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, beginning in the fall semester of 2013, a state-supported institution of higher education or a campus of the institution meets the requirements specified in subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section if the percentage of in-state students admitted to the institution or to each campus of the institution based on criteria that are in lieu of the established statewide criteria as provided in section 23-1-113 (1)(b) plus the percentage of in-state students enrolling as Colorado scholars exceeds the percentage of nonresident students admitted to the institution or to each campus of the institution based on criteria that are in lieu of the established statewide criteria.

The provisions of this subsection (5) apply only to a state-supported institution of higher education, or to a campus of the institution, that establishes and funds a Colorado scholar program.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (5) to the contrary, the number of Colorado scholars that each institution counts for purposes of subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (5) in an academic year shall not exceed eight percent of the total number of in-state students that the institution counts in the applicable fraction or percentage in that academic year.

As used in this subsection (5):

"Colorado scholar" means an in-state student who is eligible to participate in an institutional Colorado scholar program and is designated by the state-supported institution of higher education as a Colorado scholar. A student is eligible to participate in a Colorado scholar program only if the student graduates in the top ten percent of the student's high school class or graduates with at least a 3.75 grade point average, having completed a highly rigorous college preparatory curriculum, and meets any additional criteria established by the institution.

"Colorado scholar program" means an institutional program or group of programs that awards institutional financial aid or scholarships to undergraduate, degree-seeking, in-state students, with the goal of attracting in-state students to and retaining them in Colorado institutions of higher education. A state-supported institution of higher education shall provide each student who is designated as a Colorado scholar for purposes of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (5) at least two thousand five hundred dollars in annual financial aid or scholarship moneys through the institution's Colorado scholar program.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2124, § 6, effective June 11.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1676, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 55, § 4, effective March 20.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1236, § 79, effective August 7.

L. 97:

(2)(b) repealed, p. 25, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2002:

(2)(c) added, p. 1281, § 5, effective July 1; (2)(d) added, p. 1260, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(4) added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1846, § 20, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

(2)(c) and (2)(d) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1365, § 16, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(2)(c) and (2)(d) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 757, § 11, effective May 19; (2) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1268, § 9, effective August 1.

L. 2013:

(5) added, (HB 13-1320), ch. 383, p. 2245, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(4)(a) amended and (4)(d) added, (SB 18-206), ch. 372, p. 2266, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3544, § 9, effective July 1.

23-1-113.7. Commission directive - nursing programs - employer-based gift and scholarship fund - reporting requirement - legislative declaration.

The general assembly recognizes the need to provide a high quality trained workforce necessary for the delivery of quality care to seniors and other individuals. The general assembly further recognizes that limiting the number of students participating in nursing programs in the state-supported institutions of higher education frustrates the goal of delivering quality care to the number of those in need.

The commission shall develop admissions policies for nursing programs at state-supported institutions of higher education that, subject to the availability of funds through the more nurses for Colorado fund created pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, allow for a greater number of students to be admitted to nursing education programs on or after July 1, 2002, who would otherwise not be admitted because of the limit on the number of students that the institution accepted in its nursing program prior to July 1, 2002.

The commission shall direct the governing boards of state supported institutions of higher education with nursing programs to allow additional students of nursing to be admitted when there are sufficient funds available through the more nurses for Colorado fund created pursuant to subsection (4) of this section to support the increased costs associated with such students.

There is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer the more nurses for Colorado fund. Such fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from private entities and shall be continuously appropriated by the general assembly. Such moneys shall be used by the commission solely to support the development of additional capacity to allow a greater number of students to be admitted to the nursing programs in the state-supported institutions of higher education. Such moneys shall constitute gifts for the purposes of calculating fiscal year spending pursuant to section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

It is the intent of the general assembly that no general fund dollars be appropriated for the purposes of implementing the requirements of this section.

Each state-supported institution of higher education that offers a bachelor of science degree in nursing shall submit an annual report to the department of higher education that includes the following information:

The number of bachelor of science in nursing degrees and the number of associate nursing degrees, if any, awarded;

The number of nursing program graduates who passed the state nursing licensure examination; and

The total tuition for a student to complete the state-supported institution of higher education's bachelor of science degree in nursing program.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 894, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2018:

(6) added, (HB 18-1086), ch. 70, p. 631, § 4, effective March 24.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 238, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1086, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-1-114. Commission directive - study of role of state board for community colleges and occupational education and the local councils. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 760, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of the section, effective July 1, 1986. (See L. 85, p. 760.)

23-1-115. Commission directive - review and action on existing degree programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 760, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1483, § 30, effective May 28.

23-1-116. Commission directive - education degree programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 760, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 1546, § 6, effective August 2.

23-1-117. Commission directive - administrative expense reduction. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 844, § 2, effective April 22.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1138, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1834, § 8, effective June 5.

23-1-118. Commission directive - programs of excellence. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 842, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) and (4) amended and (6) added, p. 1140, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 512, § 6, effective June 6.

L. 96:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 1237, § 81, effective August 7.

L. 99:

(6)(b) amended, p. 882, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 202, § 17, effective August 4.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 819, § 8, effective May 18.

23-1-119. Department directive - transition between K-12 education system and postsecondary education system.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, in order for students to succeed at state-supported institutions of higher education, the Colorado public system of elementary and secondary education must have provided students with the skills and abilities necessary to make the transition to the postsecondary system. The general assembly further recognizes that the establishment of goals and standards for providing transition skills and abilities is the prerogative of the elementary and secondary public education system. The general assembly recognizes that, in establishing these goals and standards, the elementary and secondary education system should be in communication with the postsecondary education system regarding the skills and abilities that are needed to succeed in higher education. It is therefore the intent of the general assembly that the department, in consultation with the department of education, adopt necessary policies and procedures to facilitate the transition for students between the two systems.

In consultation with the state board of education, appropriate school boards, and governing boards of state-supported institutions of higher education, the department and the governing boards shall adopt necessary policies and procedures to promote the establishment of a mechanism for postsecondary institutions to report back to the secondary public education system concerning:

The skills and abilities, and the level of proficiency thereof, that first-year students at such postsecondary institutions need to have in order to succeed;

The level of proficiency in such skills and abilities currently exhibited by first-year students;

The level of achievement currently exhibited by first-year students; and

Any other information that will provide a better transition for students between the two education systems.

In consultation with the state board of education, governing boards of state-supported institutions of higher education, and appropriate school district boards, the department shall aid the elementary and secondary public education system and the postsecondary public education system in establishing a network to connect the faculty of postsecondary institutions with the teachers in school districts for the purpose of exchanging information.

For purposes of this section, "postsecondary" means related to instruction of students over the age of seventeen years who are not enrolled in a regular program of kindergarten through grade twelve in a public, independent, or parochial school.

Repealed.

The department shall establish an outreach team to provide training to and establish partnerships between the department and school districts, charter schools authorized by a school district pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, charter schools authorized by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22, or a board of cooperative services created and operating pursuant to article 5 of title 22 that operates one or more public schools to assist them in preparing students to transition from the K-12 education system. The team shall also provide outreach and training to individuals in workforce centers, individuals in correctional facilities, and foster youth.

The training must include:

Career advising as part of a student's individual career and education plans;

Financial literacy, including information on the free application for federal student aid and the Colorado application for state financial aid;

How to support the completion of federal and state financial aid applications;

The importance of, and return on investment of, all postsecondary options, including available state-supported websites and navigation tools on postsecondary and workforce opportunities;

The availability of state funded scholarships and financial assistance for students; and

The department's role and mission.

The training must be available to educators in conjunction with the training approved pursuant to section 22-2-127.1.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 557, § 1, effective March 25; (1) amended, p. 2184, § 62, effective June 2.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 951, § 10, effective August 6; (1) amended, p. 462, § 13, effective August 6.

L. 99:

(5) repealed, p. 849, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2006:

(4) amended, p. 1214, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2008:

(1), IP(2), and (3) amended, p. 1475, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2022:

(6) added, (HB 22-1366), ch. 244, p. 1816, § 7, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 97-1253 and House Bill 97-1219 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2006. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1366, see section 1 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-1-119.1. Department directive - notice of postsecondary educational opportunities and higher education admission guidelines.

Annually, beginning in the spring of 2006, upon receipt of the names and mailing addresses of students enrolled in the eighth grade from the board of education of each school district in Colorado and the state charter school institute, the department shall provide notice of postsecondary educational opportunities to the parents or legal guardians of all eighth-grade students enrolled in public schools in the state. Beginning January 1, 2021, the department shall provide such notice and disseminate related information through the free online career, education, and training resource created pursuant to section 24-46.3-106, if available. Otherwise, such notice is subject to available appropriation. At a minimum, the notice shall specify:

The Colorado commission on higher education's higher education admission guidelines and an explanation that compliance with the higher education admission guidelines is necessary for acceptance, but is not a guarantee of admission, to a state-supported institute of higher education;

A student's potential need for remedial education and any related financial obligations that may fall to the student's parent or legal guardian if the student desires to apply to a state-supported, four-year college or university in Colorado but does not meet the higher education admission guidelines;

A student who fails to pass a course listed in the higher education admission guidelines may enroll in a gateway course, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(b.5), with additional supports through supplemental academic instruction, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(e), successful completion of which will satisfy the requirements of the higher education admission guidelines;

The availability of and instructions for acquiring information regarding financial assistance to attend an institution of higher education, including stipend amounts, tuition, and other financial aid;

The annual state stipend amount as determined pursuant to section 23-18-202;

The annual cost of in-state tuition for attendance at a public higher education institution in the state;

The amount of the student's share of tuition as determined pursuant to section 23-18-207; and

Notification that the stipend amount and the amount of tuition may change annually.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 445, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

IP(1) amended, p. 1476, § 15, effective May 28.

L. 2019:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 19-1206), ch. 133, p. 606, § 22, effective April 25.

L. 2020:

IP(1) amended, (HB 20-1396), ch. 138, p. 600, § 4, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1206, see section 1 of chapter 133, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

23-1-119.2. Commission directive - notice of college preparatory courses for high school students.

The commission shall adopt a policy on or before October 1, 2005, to:

Obtain, on or before June 1 of each school year, from the appropriate test administrators the names and mailing addresses of all students enrolled in Colorado public schools who take a standardized, curriculum-based, achievement college entrance exam or a precollegiate exam;

Beginning in the spring of 2006, send an annual notice concerning college preparatory courses to the parent or legal guardian of each student who takes a standardized, curriculum-based, achievement, college entrance exam or a precollegiate exam. The commission shall send the notice to the parent or legal guardian prior to the start of a student's twelfth-grade year if the student took the standardized, curriculum-based, achievement, college entrance exam, or prior to the start of a student's eleventh-grade year if the student took the precollegiate exam. Beginning January 1, 2021, the department shall provide such notice and disseminate related information through the free online career, education, and training resource created pursuant to section 24-46.3-106, if available. Otherwise, such notice is subject to available appropriation. At a minimum, the notice must include:

A detailed description of what constitutes an inadequate score in mathematics, writing, or reading, based on the higher education admission guidelines established by the commission;

Information regarding a student's ability to take basic, precollegiate skills courses while enrolled in a public high school; and

Notice that a student's parent or legal guardian may contact the school in which the student is enrolled if he or she desires to develop a plan for the student to address the course work needed to meet the higher education admission guidelines adopted by the commission.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 519, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2015:

(1)(a) and IP(1)(b) amended, (HB 15-1323), ch. 204, p. 727, § 43, effective May 20.

L. 2020:

IP(1) amended, (HB 20-1396), ch. 138, p. 600, § 5, effective September 14.